Utah statutes.
7-3-24.   Certification of check.

It shall be unlawful for any bank to certify any check drawn upon the bank unless the person drawing the check has on deposit with the bank at the time the check is certified an amount of money equal to the amount specified in the check.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

